Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6289.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Commission" means the primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission created in section 5. (b) "Community health worker" means an individual who serves as a liaison between providers of health and social services and a community to facilitate access to services, improve the quality and cultural competence of service delivery, and increase the health knowledge and self-sufficiency of individuals in the community through community outreach and education, informal counseling, social support, and advocacy. (c) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (d) "Federally qualified health center" means that term as defined in 42 USC 1395x(aa)(4). (e) "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to engage in a health profession under article 15 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 to 333.18838. (f) "Innovation models" means both of the following as developed or conducted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to support health care transformation and access to quality care: (i) Payment and service delivery models. (ii) Demonstration projects. (g) "Medicaid" means the medical assistance program established under title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-9. (h) "Practitioner" means a health professional and any individual who acts under the direction or supervision of a health professional. (i) "Primary care" means the specialty of family practice, internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics, psychiatry, or emergency medicine. (j) "Primary care spending" means spending on a professional service billed by a physician practicing primary care, including, but not limited to, spending on a professional claim, an evaluation and management visit, a preventative visit, care transition or coordination of services, and an in-office preventative service, screening, or counseling, and is calculated annually in the Medical Expenditure Panel Survey by the Department of Health and Human Services Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality. Sec. 5. (1) The primary care access, improvement, and transformation commission is created in the department. (2) The commission must consist of the director of the department or the director's designee and the following 20 members, appointed by the governor: (a) This state's Medicaid director or the director's designee. (b) A physician practicing primary care who is appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan State Medical Society, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Academy of Family Physicians, or the Michigan Chapter American Academy of Pediatrics. (c) A practitioner practicing primary care who is not a physician and who is appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the American Nurses Association-Michigan, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Academy of Physician Associates, the Michigan Nurses Association, or the Michigan Council of Nurse Practitioners. (d) A representative of a federally qualified health center who is appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan Primary Care Association. (e) A practitioner or organizational leader at a federally qualified health center located in this state. (f) A community health worker appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan Community Health Worker Alliance. (g) A health professional who specializes in rural health care at a rural health clinic or hospital appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan Center for Rural Health. (h) A representative for behavioral health who is appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Community Mental Health Association of Michigan. (i) A representative for insurers that deliver, issue for delivery, or renew in this state health or dental insurance policies, appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by Blue Cross Blue Shield of Michigan or Delta Dental of Michigan. (j) A representative for health plans appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan Association of Health Plans. (k) A representative of hospitals appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan Health and Hospital Association. (l) A member of a professional medical association located in this state appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the American Nurses Association-Michigan, the Michigan Nurses Association, the Michigan Primary Care Association, or the Michigan Council of Nurse Practitioners. (m) A representative of schools of nursing that are located in this state appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the American Nurses Association-Michigan, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Nurses Association, or the Michigan Council of Nurse Practitioners. (n) A representative of schools of medicine that are located in this state appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan State Medical Society, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Academy of Family Physicians, the Michigan Chapter American Academy of Pediatrics, Michigan State University, the University of Michigan, Wayne State University, Oakland University, Western Michigan University, or Central Michigan University. (o) An individual who is an advocate for patients or is an employee of an advocacy organization for patients, who is appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan Elder Justice Initiative, Disability Rights Michigan, or the Michigan Primary Care Association. (p) A member of the health information technology commission created under section 2503 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2503. (q) An individual who is an expert on eliminating health disparities who is appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan State Medical Society, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Academy of Family Physicians, the Michigan Chapter American Academy of Pediatrics, the Michigan Public Health Institute, Michigan State University, the University of Michigan, Wayne State University, Oakland University, Western Michigan University, or Central Michigan University. (r) Three individuals who have experience navigating challenges with primary care who are appointed from a list of 3 nominees submitted by the Michigan State Medical Society, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Academy of Family Physicians, the Michigan Chapter American Academy of Pediatrics, the Michigan Elder Justice Initiative, or Disability Rights Michigan. If more than 1 person submits a list of nominees under this subdivision, each individual who is appointed to the commission must be selected from a different list of nominees. (3) The governor shall appoint the first members of the commission within 90 days after the effective date of this act. (4) The governor shall appoint 7 of the first members to 1-year terms, 7 of the first members to 2-year terms, and 7 of the first members to 3-year terms. After the first appointments, the term of a member of the commission is 3 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. (5) If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term in the same manner as the original appointment. (6) The governor may remove a member of the commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (7) The director shall call the first meeting of the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The commission shall meet at least every quarter, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of a majority of the members. (8) A majority of the members of the commission constitute a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by a majority of the members of the commission serving is required for any action of the commission. (9) The commission shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (10) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (11) A member of the commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the commission, but the commission may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. Sec. 7. (1) The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Make recommendations to the legislature and the department on ways to increase overall annual health care spending on primary care spending in this state, with the goal of increasing primary care spending by not less than 12%. (b) Examine ways to improve access to high quality and affordable primary care in this state by analyzing all of the following: (i) Other state models of transforming and improving primary care. (ii) Efforts by persons that are interested in improving access to primary care in this state. (iii) Innovation models. (iv) Data derived from other states that are seeking to improve access to primary care. (v) Any other finding, practice, program, or policy that is intended to improve access to high quality and affordable primary care. (c) Guide the direction and implementation of primary care policies and practices throughout this state. (d) Align and mobilize resources on payment and practice transformation and inform multipayer strategies, quality measures, and policy and program approaches to primary care improvement. (e) Advise the governor, department, and legislature on all aspects of primary care strategy, the coordination and administration of state programs, changes to federal programs and programs in this state, budget priorities, and the nature and magnitude of primary care access, improvement, and transformation priorities. (f) Inform applicable bureaus or offices within the department of primary-care-related Medicaid state plans and state plan amendments. (g) Hold meetings in each region of this state to receive feedback from interested persons, including, but not limited to, individuals who practice in and are seeking to improve primary care in this state. (h) Advise the department on grants that the department has not previously sought. (i) Create a statewide agenda of recommendations for evaluating primary care and identify research on primary care practices that should be prioritized. (j) Publish an annual report that complies with section 9. The commission shall post the report on the department's website in an area that is accessible to the public and provide the report to the governor and legislature. (k) At least annually, review the commission's bylaws, stated goals, and membership and leadership, and post the information on the department's website in an area that is accessible to the public. (2) The commission may do any of the following: (a) Develop and regularly publish public dashboards with information on primary care spending by payer, primary care workforce trends, and primary care access metrics in this state. (b) Create workgroups focused on specific policy topics, including, but not limited to, innovation models, access and equity, and whole-person care. Sec. 9. The commission shall publish an annual report on primary care in this state that includes all of the following information: (a) Primary care spending by payer that tracks progress toward achieving the commission's goals. (b) Primary care workforce composition, growth, and gaps. (c) Identified opportunities for improving the value and patient experience of primary care. (d) Insights and recommendations pertaining to innovation models. (e) The risks, benefits, and impacts of using artificial intelligence in achieving the commission's goals. (f) The effects of provider burnout and health system consolidation. (g) Any other information the commission determines is relevant. Sec. 11. (1) Not later than 8 years after the effective date of this act, the commission shall make a recommendation to the department on whether there is an existing or ongoing need for the commission. The department shall evaluate the commission's recommendation and, within 90 days after reviewing the commission's recommendation, report the commission's recommendation and the department's evaluation to the governor and legislature. (2) The department shall provide the commission with adequate administrative support. Sec. 13. This act is repealed effective 10 years after the effective date of this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05729'25) or House Bill No. 6288 (request no. H05729'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.